Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1977.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-502.5 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. It shall be unlawful for any federal or state agency, any


political subdivision, or any business under contract with a federal


or state agency or political subdivision to require any resident of


this state to submit to or receive a COVID-19 vaccination or any


variant thereof. Additionally, no federal or state agency,


political subdivision, or business under contract with a federal or


state agency or political subdivision shall discriminate against any


resident of this state due to vaccination status.


B. As used in this section, “political subdivision” means:

Req. No. 3493 Page 1


1. A municipality or county;


2. A school district board of education;


3. The board of regents or board of trustees of a state


educational institution which is a member of The Oklahoma State


System of Higher Education; or


4. Any other governmental or public entity located within this


state.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3493 BRC 1/15/2026 9:21:40 AM























Req. No. 3493 Page 2